Tennessee statutes. Title 38 Prevention And Detection Of Crime
Chapter 12

Domestic Violence State Coordinating Council

38-12-101. Creation.

There is created the domestic violence state coordinating council.

Acts 1995, ch. 376, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. The domestic violence state coordinating council, created by this section, terminates June 30, 2022. See §§ 4-29-112, 4-29-243.

Cross-References. Domestic abuse, in general, title 37, ch. 3, part 6.

Domestic violence offenses, notice to defendant, § 40-14-109.

Domestic violence training for firefighters, § 4-24-111.

Domestic violence training for police officers, § 38-8-112.

38-12-102. Purpose — Responsibilities.

The purpose of the coordinating council is to increase the awareness and understanding of domestic and family violence and its consequences and to reduce the incidence of domestic and family violence within the state. Domestic violence state coordinating council responsibilities include designing a:

Policy for law enforcement and judicial response to domestic violence, to be made available for use on a statewide basis;

Training course and curriculum for law enforcement personnel who are likely to encounter situations of domestic violence, on the dynamics of domestic violence and the handling, investigation and response procedures concerning reports of domestic violence, to be made available for use on a statewide basis; and

Training course and curriculum for all judges and judicial personnel, who are likely to encounter situations of domestic violence, on the dynamics of domestic violence and the handling and response procedures concerning allegations of domestic violence, to be made available on a statewide basis.

Acts 1995, ch. 376, § 2.

Attorney General Opinions. The domestic violence state coordinating council does not have authority to assess fees to offenders who are ordered by the courts to attend a batterers' intervention program, OAG 00-080 (5/1/00).

38-12-103. Membership.

The coordinating council shall consist of the following twenty-three (23) members:

The commissioner of labor and workforce development, or the commissioner's designee;

The attorney general and reporter, or the attorney general and reporter's designee;

The director of the administrative office of the courts, or the director's designee;

The executive director of the district public defenders conference, or the executive director's designee;

The director of the Tennessee bureau of investigation, or the director's designee;

The executive director of the district attorneys general conference, or the executive director's designee;

The president of the Tennessee Sheriffs' Association, or the president's designee;

The president of the state court clerks conference, or the president's designee;

The president of the Tennessee chiefs of police association, or the president's designee;

The executive director of the Tennessee Coalition to End Domestic and Sexual Violence, or the executive director's designee;

The executive director of the peace officers standards and training commission, or the executive director's designee;

The chairman of the board of probation and parole, or the chairman's designee;

The executive director of the Tennessee association of criminal defense lawyers, or the executive director's designee;

Three (3) judges or retired judges, one (1) from each grand division of this state, to be appointed by the executive director of the administrative office of the courts;

One (1) legal services attorney to be appointed by the Tennessee Alliance for Legal Services;

One (1) victim witness coordinator to be appointed by the district attorneys general conference;

Three (3) individuals with domestic violence expertise from the non-profit sector to be appointed by the Tennessee Coalition to End Domestic and Sexual Violence;

One (1) member of the senate, who shall be a non-voting advisory member, to be appointed by the speaker of the senate; and

One (1) member of the house of representatives, who shall be a non-voting advisory member, to be appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives.

In making appointments to the coordinating council, the appointing authorities shall strive to ensure that at least one (1) person serving on the council is sixty (60) years of age or older, at least one (1) person serving on the council is a member of a racial minority, and at least two (2) persons serving on the council are female.

Except as provided in subsection (d), the terms of the members of the coordinating council who are appointed under subdivisions (a)(14)-(17) shall be four (4) years. The terms of members who are appointed under subdivisions (a)(18) and (19) shall coincide with their terms of office in the general assembly; provided, that such members shall continue to serve on the coordinating council until their successors are appointed.

The entire membership of the coordinating council as comprised on June 30, 2014, shall be vacated on July 1, 2014, and new members shall be appointed in accordance with subsection (a).

In order to stagger the terms of the newly appointed coordinating council members, the appointing authorities shall make initial appointments as follows:

One (1) judge appointed under subdivision (a)(14) and one (1) individual appointed under subdivision (a)(17) shall be appointed for terms of one (1) year, which shall expire on June 30, 2015;

One (1) judge appointed under subdivision (a)(14), the legal services attorney appointed under subdivision (a)(15), and one (1) individual appointed under subdivision (a)(17) shall be appointed for terms of two (2) years, which shall expire on June 30, 2016; and

One (1) judge appointed under subdivision (a)(14), the victim witness coordinator appointed under subdivision (a)(16), and one (1) individual appointed under subdivision (a)(17) shall be appointed for terms of three (3) years, which shall expire on June 30, 2017.

Following the expiration of members' initial terms as prescribed in subdivision (d)(2), all terms shall begin on July 1 and terminate on June 30, four (4) years thereafter.

All members shall serve until the expiration of the term to which they were appointed and until their successors are appointed and qualified.

A vacancy occurring other than by expiration of a term shall be filled in the same manner as the original appointment but only for the remaining duration of the unexpired term.

An appointing authority may remove any member of the coordinating council, which such appointing authority appointed to the council, for misconduct, incompetency, willful neglect of duty, or other just cause.

Acts 1995, ch. 376, § 3; 1998, ch. 1049, §§ 7, 8; 1999, ch. 257, § 3; 2001, ch. 201, § 1; 2014, ch. 779, § 3.

Amendments. The 2014 amendment rewrote the section which read: “The coordinating council shall consist of the following or their representatives: the commissioner of labor and workforce development; attorney general and reporter; director of the administrative office of the courts; executive director of the district public defenders conference; executive director of the Tennessee association of criminal defense lawyers; executive director of the district attorneys general conference; president of the Tennessee sheriffs' association; president of the state court clerks conference; president of the Tennessee chiefs of police association; executive director of the Tennessee task force against domestic violence; executive director of the peace officers standards and training commission; four (4) judges; provided, that at least one (1) judge shall be from each grand division of the state; two (2) members of the general assembly; four (4) members to be appointed by the Tennessee task force against domestic violence; one (1) legal services attorney; one (1) victim witness coordinator; chair of the board of parole; and one (1) probation and parole officer. The domestic violence state coordinating council may add additional members, not to exceed nine (9) members, if such council determines that additional members would assist the council in fulfilling its duties. In adding new members, no more than one (1) member shall be from the same congressional representative district. Each of the nine (9) congressional representative districts shall be represented by at least one (1) member of the coordinating council who resides in such district.”

Effective Dates. Acts 2014, ch. 779, § 7. July 1, 2014.

Cross-References. Grand divisions, title 4, ch. 1, part 2.

38-12-104. Annual report.

The coordinating council shall provide an annual report on its activities to the Tennessee department of finance and administration office of criminal justice programs, the governor, and to the chief clerk of the senate and the chief clerk of the house of representatives.

Acts 2014, ch. 779, § 6.

Compiler's Notes. Former § 38-12-104 (Acts 1995, ch. 376, § 4), concerning the duration of the coordinating council, was repealed by Acts 1997, ch. 123, § 3.

Effective Dates. Acts 2014, ch. 779, § 7. July 1, 2014.

Cross-References. Reporting requirement satisfied by notice to general assembly members of publication of report, § 3-1-114.

38-12-105. Funds for support services — Reimbursement.

The Tennessee Coalition to End Domestic and Sexual Violence is authorized to use funds from the domestic violence community education fund established by § 36-3-616, to provide necessary support services for the coordinating council. Coordinating council members shall be reimbursed for travel expenses in accordance with the comprehensive travel regulations promulgated by the department of finance and administration and approved by the attorney general and reporter.

Acts 1995, ch. 376, § 5; 2014, ch. 779, § 4.

Amendments. The 2014 amendment substituted “Tennessee Coalition to End Domestic and Sexual Violence” for “Tennessee task force against domestic violence” in the first sentence.

Effective Dates. Acts 2014, ch. 779, § 7. July 1, 2014.

38-12-106. Law enforcement agency policy and education.

All law enforcement agencies with personnel who are likely to encounter situations of domestic violence shall adopt a policy regarding domestic violence and provide initial and continuing education concerning the dynamics of domestic violence, and the handling, investigation and response procedures concerning reports of domestic violence to all law enforcement personnel who are likely to encounter situations of domestic violence.

Acts 1995, ch. 376, § 6.

38-12-107. Court personnel policy and education.

All state and local court administrators, court clerks, and judges, with personnel who are likely to encounter situations involving domestic violence, shall adopt a policy regarding domestic violence and provide initial and continuing education concerning the dynamics of domestic violence, and the handling and response procedures concerning allegations of domestic violence to all judges and court personnel who are likely to encounter allegations of domestic violence.

Acts 1995, ch. 376, § 7.

38-12-108. Peace officers standards and training commission policy and education.

The peace officers standards and training commission shall establish a policy regarding and a continuing education training curriculum concerning domestic violence and shall provide it to all law enforcement agencies throughout the state whose personnel are likely to encounter situations of domestic violence. The commission may adopt the policy and training curriculum developed by the domestic violence state coordinating council, and may revise the policy and training curriculum at its discretion. The commission shall require all law enforcement agencies to comply with the requirements of this part.

Acts 1995, ch. 376, § 8.

38-12-109. Administrative office of the court policy and education.

The administrative office of the courts shall establish a policy regarding, and a continuing education curriculum concerning, domestic violence and shall provide continuing education on domestic violence to all judges and court personnel throughout the state who are likely to encounter situations of domestic violence. The administrative office of the courts may adopt the policy and training curriculum developed by the domestic violence state coordinating council, and may revise the policy and training curriculum at its discretion.

Acts 1995, ch. 376, § 9.

38-12-110. Regulation of intervention programs for perpetrators of domestic abuse.

The state coordinating council shall promulgate regulations for batterers' intervention programs for perpetrators of domestic abuse as defined in § 36-3-601, and shall certify compliance with the regulations. In formulating the regulations, the council shall conduct public hearings and shall consult with the following persons or groups:

Public and private agencies that provide batterers' intervention programs for perpetrators of domestic abuse;

Public and private agencies that provide programs for victims of domestic abuse;

Victims advocates;

Survivors of domestic abuse; and

Other persons who have demonstrated expertise and experience in the area of domestic abuse.

The regulations required by this section shall include, but not be limited to, the following topics:

Minimum standards for batterers' intervention programs; and

Monitoring and certification criteria for batterers' intervention programs.

The council may prescribe fees, not to exceed three hundred dollars ($300), for the certification of such programs.

Acts 1998, ch. 945, § 1; 2013, ch. 349, § 1.

Attorney General Opinions. The domestic violence state coordinating council does not have authority to assess fees to offenders who are ordered by the courts to attend a batterers' intervention program, OAG 00-080 (5/1/00).

38-12-111. Policies.

The coordinating council has the authority to develop policies for the operation and functioning of the council.

Acts 1999, ch. 257, § 4; 2014, ch. 779, § 5.

Amendments. The 2014 amendment rewrote the section which read: “(a) The council has the authority to develop policies for the operation and functioning of the council. Such policies shall include the process for the filling of vacancies and for establishing the terms of members.“(b) Members currently serving on the council shall serve until their terms expire, in accordance with policies adopted pursuant to this section. The provisions of this subsection (b) shall not apply to ex officio members of the council.”

Effective Dates. Acts 2014, ch. 779, § 7. July 1, 2014.